Utah statutes.
35A-8-726.   Asset disposition upon dissolution of corporation.

Upon dissolution of the corporation:

(1)  all liabilities and obligations of the corporation, including obligations to bondholders, shall be paid, satisfied, discharged, or adequately provided for; and

(2)  all remaining money, property, rights, claims, and interests of the corporation shall revert or be conveyed to the state.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 212, 2012 General Session

